District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.25b

Training of employees and operators.

(a)

(1)

A company that uses digital dispatch shall train associated operators in how to properly and safely handle mobility devices and equipment and to treat an individual with disabilities in a respectful and courteous manner.

(2)

Completion of a public vehicle-for-hire driver’s training course approved by the Commission shall satisfy the operator training requirement of this subsection.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20f-2
as added Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-197, § 2(h), 61 DCR 12430
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-197: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-197 provided, in part, that §§ 1, 2, 3, and 4 of the act shall apply as of March 10, 2015.